District of Columbia statutes.
4-517

Duty of law enforcement agencies.

(a)

All law enforcement agencies in the District of Columbia shall inform victims or secondary victims of the existence of the Program and provide application forms to victims and secondary victims.

(b)

No law enforcement agency shall be civilly liable for a failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

The Court shall provide application forms, other documents, and general information that law enforcement agencies may require to comply with this section.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 18, 44 DCR 1142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-505.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-437.

Emergency Legislation

See note to § 4-501.